Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1303.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Findings.The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) The Braille Flag was created by Randolph Cabral, the son of a blind WWII veteran, in honor of his father.(2) The flag was founded on the pillars of pride for our homeland, love of one's family, the braveness of the patriot, the selflessness of sacrifice and the inspiring legacy left by veterans who have served, who have been left with long-lasting disabilities, including loss of eyesight, or who have paid the ultimate price.(3) In April 2008, the Braille Flag was officially installed at Arlington National Cemetery as a tribute to 123456789101112131415161718 blind veterans of all wars and other blind Americans.(4) Many organizations have installed these flags in appreciation, including The Moose, a fraternal and service organization founded in 1888 with more than 1,000,000 members in approximately 1,500 Lodges in all 50 states.Section 2. Monument.(a) Location.--The Braille Flag Monument shall be located in the East Wing of the State Capitol Building.(b) Material and form.--The Braille Flag Monument shall be made of bronze and shall include the Pledge of Allegiance written in braille.Section 3. The Department of General Services.(a) Coordination.--The Department of General Services shall coordinate with The Moose organization and facilitate the selection and preparation of the designated site, as well as the placement and installation of the Braille Flag Monument.(b) Construction.--Except as provided in subsection (a), nothing in this act shall be construed to impose any duties upon the Department of General Services.Section 4. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20260SB1303PN1643 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021